New York, session 2025-2026, A8085.
do enact as follows:
1 Section 1. Section 384-e of the retirement and social security law is
2 amended by adding three new subdivisions d, e and f to read as follows:
3 d. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, upon
4 completion of twenty years of service, and upon retirement, each such
5 member who was previously credited with service credit in the New York
6 state and local employees' retirement system or the New York state and
7 local police and fire retirement system as an officer appointed by the
8 state university pursuant to paragraph l of subdivision two of section
9 three hundred fifty-five of the education law and who has successfully
10 completed a course of law enforcement training as provided in such
11 section of the education law may receive for each such year of previous
12 service, up to a total of no greater than five years of previous
13 service, additional pension equal to one-sixtieth of such member's final
14 average salary.
15 To obtain such credit a member shall pay such retirement system, for
16 deposit in the fund used to accumulate employer contributions, a sum
17 equal to the product of the number of years of service being claimed
18 and three percent of such member's compensation earned during the twelve
EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets
[ ] is old law to be omitted.
LBD09707-04-6

A. 8085--A 2
1 months of credited service immediately preceding the date that the
2 member made application for credit pursuant to this section.
3 e. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, upon
4 completion of twenty years of service, and upon retirement, each such
5 member who was previously credited with service credit in the New York
6 state and local employees' retirement system or the New York state and
7 local police and fire retirement system as an officer or member of the
8 regional state park police department may receive for each such year of
9 previous service, up to a total of no greater than five years of previ-
10 ous service, additional pension equal to one-sixtieth of such member's
11 final average salary.
12 To obtain such credit a member shall pay such retirement system, for
13 deposit in the fund used to accumulate employer contributions, a sum
14 equal to the product of the number of years of service being claimed
15 and three percent of such member's compensation earned during the twelve
16 months of credited service immediately preceding the date that the
17 member made application for credit pursuant to this section.
18 f. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, upon
19 completion of twenty years of service, and upon retirement, each such
20 member who was previously credited with service credit in the New York
21 state and local employees' retirement system as an investigator in a
22 detective investigator role employed in the office of the attorney
23 general may receive for each such year of previous service, up to a
24 total of no greater than five years of previous service, additional
25 pension equal to one-sixtieth of such member's final average salary.
26 To obtain such credit a member shall pay such retirement system, for
27 deposit in the fund used to accumulate employer contributions, a sum
28 equal to the product of the number of years of service being claimed
29 and three percent of such member's compensation earned during the twelve
30 months of credited service immediately preceding the date that the
31 member made application for credit pursuant to this section.
32 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.
FISCAL NOTE.--Pursuant to Legislative Law, Section 50:
This bill would allow up to five years of service rendered as a police
officer with (a) the State University of New York or Regional State Park
Police Department, or (b) as an investigator in the Office of the Attor-
ney General to be credited toward additional sixtieths under section
384-e of the Retirement and Social Security Law. The members must have
20 years of service credit and would be required to make a payment equal
to three percent of their most recent compensation per year of service
credit.
Insofar as this bill affects the New York State and Local Police and
Fire Retirement System (NYSLPFRS), there are 156 benefiting members with
annual salary of approximately $19 million as of March 31, 2025. These
members can immediately purchase approximately 270 years of service
credit, generating a past service cost of $9.0 million. The cost will be
shared by the participating employers in NYSLPFRS and spread over future
billing cycles.
The number of future members who could be affected by this legislation
cannot be readily determined. For each additional year of service credit
granted pursuant to this legislation, there will be additional costs
averaging 27% of the member's compensation. All costs will be borne by
the state of New York and local participating employers in NYSLPFRS.
Summary of relevant resources:
Membership data as of March 31, 2025 was used to measure the impact of
the bill, the same data used in the Actuarial Valuations dated April 1,

A. 8085--A 3
2025. Distributions and other statistics can be found in the 2025 Report
of the Actuary and the 2025 Annual Comprehensive Financial Report. The
actuarial assumptions and methods used are described in the 2025 Annual
Report to the Comptroller on Actuarial Assumptions, and the Codes, Rules
and Regulations of the State of New York: Audit and Control. The fair
value of assets and GASB disclosures can be found in the 2025 Financial
Statements and Supplementary Information.
Assumptions, demographics, and other considerations may have been
modified to better reflect specific provisions of any proposed benefit
change(s).
This fiscal note does not constitute a legal opinion on the viability
of the bill, nor is it intended to serve as a substitute for the profes-
sional judgment of an attorney.
This estimate, dated March 30, 2026, and intended for use only during
the 2026 Legislative Session, is Fiscal Note Number 2026-97. As Chief
Actuary of the New York State and Local Retirement System (NYSLRS), I,
Aaron Schottin Young, hereby certify that this analysis complies with
applicable Actuarial Standards of Practice as well as the Code of Pro-
fessional Conduct and Qualification Standards for Actuaries Issuing
Statements of Actuarial Opinion of the American Academy of Actuaries, of
which I am a member. I am a member of NYSLRS but do not believe it
impairs my objectivity.